Washington statutes.
RCW 4.80.040

Manner of taking and entry.

Exceptions to any ruling or decision made in the course of a trial or hearing, or in the progress of a cause, except those to which it is provided in this chapter that no exception need be taken and those to which some other mode of exception is in this chapter prescribed, may be taken by any party by stating to the court, judge, referee or commissioner making the ruling or decision, when the same is made, that such party excepts to the same; whereupon such court, judge, referee or commissioner shall note the exception in the minutes of the trial, hearing or cause, or shall cause the stenographer (if one is in attendance) so to note the same.

[ 1893 c 60 s 6; RRS s 386.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 46.